Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8804
Committee; establish grant process;
reports.

(1) The committee shall establish a grant process
to award grants to Nebraska institutions or researchers for the purpose of
conducting nonembryonic stem cell research. The grant process shall include,
but not be limited to, an application identifying the institution or researcher
applying for the grant, the amount of funds to be received by the applicant
from sources other than state funds, the sources of such funds, and a description
of the goal of the research for which the funds will be used and research
methods to be used by the applicant.

(2) The committee shall submit electronically an annual report
to the Legislature stating the
number of grants awarded, the amount of the grants, and the researchers or
institutions to which the grants were awarded.

Laws 2008, LB606, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 128.